src/morphology/affixes/acronyms.lexc
!! !!!Acronym inflection
!! Acronyms are inflected using a colon, followed by the inflectional endings,
!! which depend on either last letter of the word or inflection class of the
!! last word of the abbreviation. The exception to the inflection scheme is the
!! singular nominative, which appears without colon.
!!
!! Pronouncable abbreviations such as aids, hiv, kela, alko etc. are actually
!! counted as regular words with regular inflection patterns.
!!
!! c.f. [VISK § 169|http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=169]


!! !!Acronyms ending in numbers inflect like the numbers are pronounced.
!LEXICON ACRO_YKSI
! The acronyms ending in digit 1 pronounced as number:
!!€gt-norm: Number-final acronyms
!!€ A1: A1+N+Sg+Nom # A1 paper
!!€ A1:een: A1+N+Sg+Ill
!0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
!+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Par:%>%:tä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>%:een   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

!LEXICON ACRO_KAKSI
! The acronyms ending in digit 2 pronounced as number
!€ A2 A2+N+Sg+Nom A2 paper
!€ A2:een A2+N+Sg+Ill
!0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
!+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Par:%>%:ta    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>%:een   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>a    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_KOLME
!! The acronyms ending in digit 3 pronounced as number
!!€gt-norm: mp3
!!€ MP3: MP3+N+Sg+Nom # mp3 music file
!!€ MP3:een: MP3+N+Sg+Ill
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:a ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:een   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>a    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

!LEXICON ACRO_NELJÄ
! The acronyms ending in digit 4 pronounced as number
!€ A4 A4+N+Sg+Nom A4 paper
!€ A4:ään A4+N+Sg+Ill
!0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
!+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Par:%>%:ää    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>%:ään   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
